Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIX Public Safety and Morals
Pari-Mutuel Wagering for Harness Racing

230.385.
Regulation of pari-mutuel wagering. [Repealed.]

230.386.
Report of unclaimed pari-mutuel tickets presumed abandoned. [Repealed.]

230.387.
Money to be turned over to commission. [Repealed.]

230.388.
Judicial determination of rights. [Repealed.]

230.389.
Payment to commission relieves person of claims liability. [Repealed.]

230.390.
Time for filing claims. [Repealed.]

230.391.
Commission’s consideration of claim — Payment. [Repealed.]

230.392.
Appeals. [Repealed.]

230.393.
Examination of records. [Repealed.]

230.394.
Rules. [Repealed.]

230.395.
Civil action authorized. [Repealed.]

230.396.
Costs — Payment. [Repealed.]

230.397.
Statute of limitations for person under disability. [Repealed.]

230.398.
Funds to be used for purses at harness racing events at county fairs.

All sums reported and paid to the racing commission under the provisions of KRS

230.361

to

230.373

by any licensee conducting a harness race meeting shall be used by it for purses at harness racing events at county fairs within the Commonwealth of Kentucky that have been licensed and approved by it. The racing commission shall have the authority to promulgate administrative regulations as may be necessary for the conduct of these races.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 84, § 14, effective July 15, 1980; 1992, ch. 109, § 31, effective March 30, 1992; 2004, ch. 191, § 38, effective July 13, 2004; 2010, ch. 24, § 482, effective July 15, 2010.